Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Department of Financial Institutions

4-3-401. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of financial institutions.

Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 2; modified; Acts 1983, ch. 216, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. The department of financial institutions, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§4-29-112,4-29-242.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of financial institutions, §4-3-101.

Department of financial institutions, organization, powers and duties, title 45, ch. 1, part 1.

4-3-402. Commissioner — Appointment.

The department of financial institutions shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of financial institutions.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the governor and shall serve at the governor's pleasure.

Acts 1973, ch. 294, §§ 3, 4; modified; T.C.A., § 4-301; Acts 1983, ch. 216, §§ 6, 7.

Cross-References. Commissioner of financial institutions, appointment, qualifications, §45-1-105.

4-3-403. Powers and duties.

The department of financial institutions shall exercise all the rights, powers and duties described in title 45 and otherwise vested by law in the department, the commissioner of financial institutions, and the commissioner's officers, assistants and employees.

Acts 1973, ch. 294, § 7; T.C.A., § 4-344; Acts 1983, ch. 216, § 8.